Massachusetts, session 194th, H4201.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. At the next annual municipal election in the City of Chicopee, and at such
election in every fourth year thereafter, the mayor shall be elected by the qualified voters of the
City voting in their respective precincts. The mayor shall be elected by ballot and shall hold
office for four years from the first Monday in January following the election at which they were
elected, and until a successor is elected and qualified.
SECTION 2. Chapter 144 of the acts of 1917 is hereby repealed.
SECTION 3. So much of the charter of said City and of the amendments thereto as is
inconsistent herewith is hereby repealed.
SECTION 4. This act shall take effect upon its acceptance by a majority of the qualified
voters of the City of Chicopee, present and voting therein at the state election in the current year.
of 1